Utah statutes.
57-16-16.   Mobile home park residents' associations.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Park operator" means an owner, operator, or manager of a mobile home
park, including an employee, agent, or independent contractor of the owner,
operator, or manager.
(b)  "Primary resident association" means, for a mobile home park with more
than one resident association, the resident association that has more members
than any other resident association within the mobile home park.
(c)  "Resident association" means an organization of mobile home park
residents organized to address their common interests and concerns related to
the mobile home park.
(d)  "Resident entity" means a noncommercial entity that:
(i)  advocates for residents of the mobile home park; or
(ii)  addresses issues relating to mobile home parks that affect or are of
concern to residents of the mobile home park.
(2) (a)  Residents in a mobile home park may:
(i)  form a resident association; and
(ii)  participate in a regional, state, or national resident association or
advocacy group.
(b)  A resident association may limit membership in a resident association to
owners of manufactured homes within a mobile home park if the purpose of the
resident association is to purchase some or all of the mobile home park.
(c) (i)  There may be more than one resident association for a mobile home
park.
(ii)  A park operator is not required to acknowledge any resident association
other than the primary resident association.
(3)  At a meeting at which a majority of members are present, resident
association members may:
(a)  elect officers of the resident association; and
(b)  adopt bylaws of the resident association.
(4) (a)  Except in an emergency, a resident association shall provide seven
days' notice of a resident association meeting to all residents of the mobile
home park.
(b)  A resident of a mobile home park may attend a meeting of a resident
association, whether or not the resident is a member of the resident
association.
(5) (a)  An officer or member of a resident association may not be held
personally responsible or liable for an act or omission of the resident
association or of another officer or member of the resident association.
(b)  Subsection (5)(a) may not be construed to limit the liability of an
individual who is an officer or member of a resident association for the
individual's act or omission.
(6)  A park operator may not:
(a)  be a member of a resident association;
(b)  attend a meeting of the resident association unless given a written
invitation to the meeting by an officer of the resident association;
(c)  unlawfully interfere with the resident association's operation;
(d)  interfere with a resident's right to contact a state or local health
department, a municipality, or other group to complain about the health and
safety conditions of the mobile home park; or
(e)  harass or threaten a resident association.
(7)  A resident association may not:
(a)  impose fees, dues, or assessments, upon its members unless a majority of
the members agree to the imposition of fees, dues, or assessments; or
(b)  harass or threaten a park operator.
(8)  A park operator shall permit meetings by a resident association located
within the park relating to manufactured home living or social or educational
purposes, including forums for or speeches by public officials or candidates
for public office.
(9)  Except for reasonable time, place, and manner limitations, a park
operator may not prohibit or adopt a rule prohibiting a mobile home park
resident or a resident entity from exercising within the mobile home park the
right of free expression for noncommercial purposes, including peacefully
organizing, assembling, canvassing, petitioning, leafleting, or distributing
written, noncommercial material within the mobile home park.
(10) (a)  A resident association may schedule with the park operator the use
of the mobile home park's common facilities, if any, free of charge.
(b)  A resident association is responsible for any damage to the mobile home
park's common facilities caused by a member of the resident association or a
guest or invitee while the resident association uses a common facility.
(c)  A park operator may reasonably limit the frequency of a resident
association's use of a common facility if the limitation allows use at least
once per week.
(d)  A park operator may not:
(i)  charge a resident or resident association a security deposit to use a
common facility of the mobile home park that exceeds the amount normally and
uniformly charged as a security deposit for use of the common facility; or
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (10)(e), require a resident or resident
association to obtain liability insurance in order to use a common facility.
(e)  A park operator may require liability insurance if:
(i)  the rules of the mobile home park permit the consumption of alcoholic
beverages in a common facility; and
(ii)  alcoholic beverages are to be served at a meeting or private function of
the resident association in the common facility.
(11) (a)  A park operator may not alter or refuse to renew an existing rental
agreement, change a rule of the mobile home park, enforce a mobile home park
rule in an unreasonable or nonuniform way, bring or threaten to bring an
eviction action or other civil action, or take any other action in retaliation
based primarily on a resident:
(i)  expressing an intention to complain or having complained to a
governmental agency about a matter relating to the mobile home park;
(ii)  making a complaint in good faith to the park operator;
(iii)  filing or expressing an intention to file a lawsuit or administrative
action against the park operator; or
(iv)  testifying in a judicial or administrative proceeding or before a public
body.
(b)  Subsection (11)(a) does not limit a defense available under the law to a
resident in an eviction action.
(12)  This section may not be construed to prohibit a park operator from:
(a)  evicting a tenant as provided in other provisions of this chapter; or
(b)  exercising other rights the park operator has under applicable law.
